Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144A.74, is amended to read: 144A.74 MAXIMUM CHARGES. A supplemental nursing services agencynew text begin or a health care worker platform as defined in section 144A.761, subdivision 5,new text end must not bill or receive payments from a nursing home licensed under this chapter at a rate higher than 150 percent of the sum of the weighted average wage rate, plus a factor determined by the commissioner to incorporate payroll taxes as defined in section 256R.02, subdivision 37, for the applicable employee classification for the geographic group specified in section 256R.23, subdivision 4. The weighted average wage rates must be determined by the commissioner of human services and reported to the commissioner of health on an annual basis. Wages are defined as hourly rate of pay and shift differential, including weekend shift differential and overtime. Facilities shall provide information necessary to determine weighted average wage rates to the commissioner of human services in a format requested by the commissioner. The maximum rate must include all charges for administrative fees, contract fees, or other special charges in addition to the hourly rates for the temporary nursing pool personnel supplied to a nursing homenew text begin or for the health care workers who book and work shifts at a nursing home via a health care worker platformnew text end . A nursing homenew text begin : (1)new text end that pays for the actual travel and housing costs for supplemental nursing services agency staff working at the facilitynew text begin or for health care workers who book and work shifts via a health care worker platform while the workers are working at the facility;new text end and new text begin (2) new text end that pays these costs to the employeenew text begin or workernew text end , the agency, or another vendor, is not violating the limitation on charges described in this section. Sec. 2. new text begin [144A.761] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin For purposes of sections 144A.761 to 144A.764, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Health care facility. new text end new text begin "Health care facility" means a hospital, boarding care home, or outpatient surgical center licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.58; a nursing home or home care provider licensed under this chapter; an assisted living facility licensed under chapter 144G; or a board and lodging establishment registered under section 157.17 to provide supportive services or health supervision services. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Health care worker. new text end new text begin "Health care worker" means a worker who provides services on a temporary basis at one or more health care facilities. Health care worker includes a licensed health professional, a worker who provides health services to patients for which a license is not required, and a worker who provides dietary, housekeeping, or administrative services. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Health care worker platform. new text end new text begin "Health care worker platform" means a person, corporation, partnership, or association that operates or offers an electronic platform, system, or application through which health care workers can accept one or more shifts to provide services on a temporary basis at a health care facility. A health care worker platform is not a supplemental nursing services agency as defined in section 144A.70, subdivision 6. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [144A.762] REGISTRATION OF HEALTH CARE WORKER PLATFORMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Oversight. new text end new text begin The commissioner is responsible for ensuring compliance with sections 144A.761 to 144A.764. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Registration required. new text end new text begin (a) A health care worker platform must register with the commissioner prior to operating in the state and annually thereafter. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a health care worker platform operating in Minnesota as of July 1, 2025, must submit a registration application to the commissioner by October 1, 2025, and may continue to operate in Minnesota while its application is pending. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application for initial registration. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish application forms for initial registration and procedures for processing applications for initial registration. An application for initial registration must include at least the following: new text end new text begin (1) the name of each of the health care worker platform's shareholders and owners with an ownership interest of greater than five percent; new text end new text begin (2) the name of each of the health care worker platform's officers and directors or the names of each of the health care worker platform's members and partners; new text end new text begin (3) the health care worker platform's certificate of good standing issued under section 5.12; new text end new text begin (4) the health care worker platform's articles of incorporation or other establishing documents; new text end new text begin (5) an attestation by the health care worker platform that it acknowledges and will operate in compliance with sections 144A.74 and 144A.761 to 144A.764; new text end new text begin (6) proof of compliance with section 144A.763, subdivision 2, paragraphs (a) and (b), regarding proof of insurance; new text end new text begin (7) an initial registration application fee in the amount specified in subdivision 4; and new text end new text begin (8) other information the commissioner determines is necessary to evaluate the initial registration application. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Registration fees. new text end new text begin (a) An applicant for initial registration must submit with the application an initial registration application fee of $........ An applicant for registration renewal must submit with the application a registration renewal application fee of $........ new text end new text begin (b) Fees collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the state government special revenue fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Consideration of application; period of validity. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must review and issue a decision on each application for initial registration within 30 days after the application is submitted. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must approve a health care worker platform's application and issue a registration if the applicant submitted a complete application, paid the initial registration application fee, and meets the registration requirements in sections 144A.761 to 144A.764. new text end new text begin (c) If an applicant fails to submit to the commissioner the information or fee required under subdivision 3, the commissioner may refuse to issue a registration to the health care worker platform. new text end new text begin (d) A registration issued under this section is effective for one year from the date of issuance, unless: new text end new text begin (1) the registration is revoked or suspended under subdivision 8; or new text end new text begin (2) the health care worker platform is sold or the ownership or management of the health care worker platform is transferred. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Renewal. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish application forms for registration renewal and procedures for processing applications for registration renewal. A health care worker platform that holds a current registration and through which health care workers accepted shifts at health care facilities in the state during the year preceding the registration renewal date may apply for registration renewal by: new text end new text begin (1) submitting to the commissioner an application for registration renewal in which the applicant either: new text end new text begin (i) certifying that there are no changes to the information on the applicant's most recent application submitted to the commissioner; or new text end new text begin (ii) updating information that changed since the applicant's most recent application submitted to the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (2) submitting a registration renewal application fee in the amount specified in subdivision 4. new text end new text begin A health care worker platform that holds a current registration, through which health care workers did not accept shifts at health care facilities in the state during the year preceding the registration renewal date, and that wishes to renew its registration must apply for registration according to subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must review and issue a decision on each application for registration renewal within 30 days after the application is submitted. The commissioner must renew the applicant's registration if the applicant submitted a complete application, paid the registration renewal application fee, and continues to meet the registration requirements in sections 144A.761 to 144A.764. A registered health care worker platform may continue to operate in the state while the platform's registration renewal application is pending. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Appeals. new text end new text begin An entity that applied for registration or a registered health care worker platform may appeal the commissioner's decision to not approve an application for registration, to suspend a registration, to revoke a registration, or to not renew a registration. A registered health care worker platform may continue to operate in the state while the platform's appeal of the decision to not renew the platform's registration is pending. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Denials, suspensions, and revocations. new text end new text begin The commissioner may deny, refuse to renew, revoke, or suspend the registration of a health care worker platform for: new text end new text begin (1) lack of financial solvency or suitability; new text end new text begin (2) failing to submit the information or fee required for initial registration or registration renewal; new text end new text begin (3) failing to meet the requirements in sections 144A.761 to 144A.764; or new text end new text begin (4) knowingly providing a health care worker with an illegally or fraudulently obtained or issued diploma; registration, license, or certificate to practice as a health care worker; or criminal records check result. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Registration not transferable. new text end new text begin When a health care worker platform is sold or ownership or management of a health care worker platform is transferred, the registration must be voided no later than 90 days after the transfer, and the new owner or operator may apply for a new registration. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [144A.763] OPERATIONAL REQUIREMENTS FOR HEALTH CARE WORKER PLATFORMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Prohibited acts. new text end new text begin (a) In operating the platform, a health care worker platform is prohibited from: new text end new text begin (1) requiring a health care worker to enter into a covenant not to compete. This clause shall not be construed to limit the protections in section 181.988; new text end new text begin (2) requiring a health care worker or health care facility to pay a fee or compensation to the health care worker platform if a health care worker accepts an offer of employment from a health care facility; new text end new text begin (3) restricting a health care worker from engaging in another occupation or business, including but not limited to other health care work or other work in a health care facility; or new text end new text begin (4) restricting a health care worker from accepting shifts through another health care worker platform or from a health care facility that does not offer shifts on this health care worker platform, except that a health care worker platform may remove from the platform a health care worker who accepts simultaneous shifts on two different health care worker platforms. new text end new text begin (b) A health care worker must not accept shifts through a health care worker platform at a single health care facility for 90 or more consecutive days. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in sections 144A.761 to 144A.764 shall be construed to prohibit a health care worker platform from generally advertising to the public that the health care worker platform is seeking health care workers to accept shifts through the platform. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Insurance coverage and liability for payment of taxes. new text end new text begin (a) A health care worker platform must maintain occupational accident insurance that applies to the work of health care workers who accept shifts through the platform. new text end new text begin (b) A health care worker platform must maintain general liability insurance and professional liability insurance. new text end new text begin (c) A health care worker platform must notify health care workers that the health care worker is responsible for the payment of all federal and state individual income taxes owed on the health care worker's earnings for shifts accepted through the platform. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Record keeping. new text end new text begin (a) A health care worker platform must retain records demonstrating that each health care worker using the platform: new text end new text begin (1) meets at least the minimum applicable licensing, training, and continuing education requirements for the position for which the health care worker is seeking to accept shifts through the platform; new text end new text begin (2) has completed and passed a criminal records check; new text end new text begin (3) has completed an exclusion check from the United States Department of Health and Human Services Office of the Inspector General; new text end new text begin (4) has professional references; and new text end new text begin (5) meets all pertinent requirements relating to the health and other qualifications of personnel working in health care facilities. new text end new text begin (b) A health care worker platform must retain the records required under paragraph (a) until five years after the date the health care worker last accepted a shift through the platform. Upon request by the commissioner, a health care platform must make available to the commissioner the records required under paragraph (a). new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [144A.764] APPLICATION OF SUPPLEMENTAL NURSING SERVICES AGENCY LAWS. new text end new text begin A health care worker platform registered under sections 144A.761 to 144A.764 is not a supplemental nursing services agency as defined in section 144A.70, subdivision 6. A supplemental nursing services agency is prohibited from registering as a health care worker platform under sections 144A.761 to 144A.764. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the state government special revenue fund to the commissioner of health for the registration of health care worker platforms under Minnesota Statutes, sections 144A.761 to 144A.764. new text end